Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB697.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9756 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 9756. Sentence of total confinement.* * *(c.2) Determinate sentence.--A court may impose a determinate sentence under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles) where the violation is graded as a summary offense and the maximum sentence of total confinement is 90 days or less. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude an otherwise eligible defendant from work release or prevent a court from sentencing a defendant to probation, including the 123456789101112131415161718192021 restrictive conditions of probation imposed under section 9763(c).* * *Section 2. Sections 1543(b)(1)(i) and (ii) and (1.1)(i) and 1556(b)(1) and (2) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1543. Driving while operating privilege is suspended or revoked.* * *(b) Certain offenses.--(1) The following shall apply:(i) A person who drives a motor vehicle on a highway or trafficway of this Commonwealth at a time when the person's operating privilege is suspended or revoked as a condition of acceptance of Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition for a violation of section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) or the former section 3731, because of a violation of section 1547(b)(1) (relating to suspension for refusal) or 3802 or former section 3731 or is suspended under section 1581 (relating to Driver's License Compact) for an offense substantially similar to a violation of section 3802 or former section 3731 shall, upon a first conviction, be guilty of a summary offense and shall be sentenced to pay a fine of $500 and to undergo imprisonment for a period of [not less than 60 days nor more than 90 days] 60 days.(ii) A second violation of this paragraph shall constitute a summary offense and, upon conviction of this paragraph, a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of $1,000 and to undergo imprisonment for [not less than] 90 20250SB0697PN0724 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days.* * *(1.1) (i) A person who has an amount of alcohol by weight in his blood that is equal to or greater than .02% at the time of testing or who at the time of testing has in his blood any amount of a Schedule I or nonprescribed Schedule II or III controlled substance, as defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or its metabolite or [who refuses testing of blood or breath] who refuses testing of breath under section 1547 or chemical testing of blood pursuant to a valid search warrant, court order or any other basis permissible by the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania, and who drives a motor vehicle on any highway or trafficway of this Commonwealth at a time when the person's operating privilege is suspended or revoked as a condition of acceptance of Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition for a violation of section 3802 or former section 3731 or because of a violation of section 1547(b)(1) or 3802 or former section 3731 or is suspended under section 1581 for an offense substantially similar to a violation of section 3802 or former section 3731 shall, upon a first conviction, be guilty of a summary offense and shall be sentenced to pay a fine of $1,000 and to undergo imprisonment for a period of [not less than] 90 days.* * *§ 1556. Ignition interlock limited license.* * *20250SB0697PN0724 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Petition.--(1) An applicant for an ignition interlock limited license shall file a petition with the department, by certified mail, on a form prescribed by the department[, and shall include proof that an approved ignition interlock system, as defined in section 3801, has been installed in one or more motor vehicles that the applicant seeks permission to operate.(2) The petition shall also include proof of financial responsibility covering each vehicle the applicant requests to be permitted to operate.]. The petition shall include proof of financial responsibility covering each vehicle the applicant requests to be permitted to operate. As part of the petition, the applicant shall be responsible for self-certifying, on a form provided by the department, the vehicles the applicant owns, registers and intends to operate. Upon approval of the petition, the ignition interlock system shall be installed in any motor vehicle to be operated by the applicant, and proof of installation shall be provided by the ignition interlock device vendor.(2) The department shall promulgate regulations to require additional information as well as additional evidence to verify the information contained in the petition.* * *Section 3. Section 3805 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3805. Ignition interlock.* * *(h.3) Notice to department.--If a violation under subsection (h.2)(1), (2) or (3) occurs in the two consecutive months prior 20250SB0697PN0724 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the date entered on the certificate, the vendor shall notify the department as to the violation on a form designated by the department, and the department shall notify the person of the violation and that ignition interlock device usage shall continue until no violations have occurred within a 60-day period.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 1556(b)(1) and (2) and 3805(h.3) shall take effect in 11 months.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0697PN0724 - 5 - 123456789101112